Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1422
Fundraising event, defined.

Fundraising event shall mean an event such as a dinner, reception, testimonial, rally, auction, bingo, or similar affair through which contributions are solicited or received by such means as purchase of a ticket, payment of an attendance fee, donations or chances for prizes, or through purchase of goods or services.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 22.